sv: Okrasort: Babyokra; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Grön okra; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Röd okra; Övrigt
da: Okravariant: Babyokra; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Grøn okra; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Rød okra; Andet
vi: Giống đậu bắp: Đậu bắp non; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Đậu bắp xanh; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Đậu bắp đỏ; Khác
ro-RO: Varietate de okra: Bame baby; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Bame verzi; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Bame roșii; Altele
bg-BG: Сорт бамя: Бейби бамя; Клемсън без бодли; Емералд; Зелена бамя; Джейд; Дамски пръсти; Номбо гигант; Червено бургунди; Червена бамя; Друго
zh-TW: 秋葵品種: 迷你秋葵; 無刺克萊姆森; 翡翠; 綠秋葵; 碧玉; 羊角豆; 巨無霸; 勃根地紅; 紅秋葵; 其他
hu: Okra fajtája: Bébi okra; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Zöld okra; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Piros okra; Egyéb
sk-SK: Odroda okry: Baby okra; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Zelená okra; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Červená okra; Iná
sl-SI: Sorta okre: Mlada bamija; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Zelena bamija; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Rdeča bamija; Drugo
pt-BR: Quiabo variedade: Mini quiabo; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Quiabo verde; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Quiabo vermelho; Outros
tr: Bamya çeşidi: Bebek bamya; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Yeşil bamya; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Kırmızı bamya; Diğer
nl: Okravariëteit: Baby-okra; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Groene okra; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Rode okra; Overige
ru: Сорт бамии: Мини-бамия; Клемсон спайнлесс; Эмеральд; Зеленая бамия; Джейд; Дамские пальчики; Номбо джайант; Ред бургунди; Красная бамия; Другое
it: Varietà di gombo: Gombo baby; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Gombo verde; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Gombo rosso; Altro
hr-HR: Sorta okre: Baby bamija; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Zelena bamija; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Crvena Burgundy; Crvena bamija; Ostalo
zh-CN: 秋葵品种: 迷你秋葵; 克莱姆森无刺秋葵; 翡翠秋葵; 绿秋葵; 碧玉秋葵; 羊角豆; 农博巨型秋葵; 勃艮第红秋葵; 红秋葵; 其他
th: พันธุ์กระเจี๊ยบ: กระเจี๊ยบฝักอ่อน; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; กระเจี๊ยบเขียว; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; กระเจี๊ยบแดง; อื่นๆ
es: Variedad de okra: Okra baby; Clemson Spineless; Esmeralda; Okra verde; Jade; Dedo de dama; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Okra roja; Otra
el: Ποικιλία μπάμιας: Baby μπάμιες; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Πράσινες μπάμιες; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Κόκκινες μπάμιες; Άλλο
pt-PT: Variedade de quiabo: Mini quiabo; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Quiabo verde; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Quiabo vermelho; Outro
en: Okra variety: Baby okra; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Green okra; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Red okra; Other
lt-LT: Valgomosios ybiškės veislė: Mažosios okros; „Clemson Spineless“; „Emerald“; Žaliosios okros; „Jade“; „Ladyfinger“; „Nombo Giant“; „Red Burgundy“; Raudonosios okros; Kita
ko: 오크라 품종: 미니 오크라; 클렘슨 스파인리스; 에메랄드; 그린 오크라; 제이드; 레이디핑거; 놈보 자이언트; 레드 버건디; 레드 오크라; 기타
cs: Odrůda okry: Baby okra; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Zelená okra; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Červená okra; Ostatní
nb: Okravariant: Babyokra; Clemson spineless; Emerald; Grønn okra; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo giant; Red burgundy; Rød okra; Annet
pl: Odmiana okry: Okra baby; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Zielona okra; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Czerwona okra; Inne
fi: Okralajike: Baby-okra; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Vihreä okra; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Punainen okra; Muu
ja: オクラの種類: ベビーオクラ; クレムソン・スパイネレス; エメラルド; グリーンオクラ; ジェイド; レディフィンガー; ノンボジャイアント; レッドバーガンディ; レッドオクラ; その他
fr: Variété de gombo: Mini gombo; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Gombo vert; Jade; Doigt de dame; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Gombo rouge; Autre
de: Okrasorte: Baby-Okra; Clemson Spineless; Emerald; Grüne Okra; Jade; Ladyfinger; Nombo Giant; Red Burgundy; Rote Okra; Sonstige